Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1808
Actions between state agencies, boards, commissions, constitutional officers, and members of the Legislature; costs awarded; when.

Notwithstanding sections 25-1803, 25-21,210, 81-8,228, and 84-216, whenever a state agency, board, commission, or constitutional officer, any person acting in behalf of the agency, board, commission, or constitutional officer, or the Legislature brings a legal action or proceeding against another agency, board, commission, or constitutional officer or the Legislature, and fails to substantially prevail in the action or proceeding, as determined by the court, the party against whom the action is brought shall be awarded fees and other expenses incident to the action or proceeding by the court. Fees and expenses that shall be awarded include reasonable attorney's fees, reasonable expert witness fees, and court costs. If the Attorney General represented the agency, board, commission, constitutional officer, or Legislature, he or she shall prepare a billing of the services provided by his or her office, and the amount billed less any reduction made by the court shall be paid to the Legal Services Fund. The agency, board, commission, constitutional officer, or Legislature responsible for the payment of fees and expenses pursuant to this section shall make payment from funds appropriated to the agency, board, commission, constitutional officer, or Legislature unless a special fund or appropriation has been made for such purpose by the Legislature.

Laws 1993, LB 781, § 1.